New York, session 2025-2026, S10558.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 2 of chapter 573 of the laws of 2 2025 relating to enacting the "county of Westchester public works 3 investment act", is amended to read as follows: 4 2. "Authorized project" shall mean, in conformity with the require- 5 ments of this act, any installation, construction, demolition, recon- 6 struction, excavation, rehabilitation, repair, and renovation in 7 connection with the following: 8 (a) a public building known as the "Westchester County Labs and 9 Research Building", located at 10 Dana Road in the hamlet of Valhalla in 10 the town of Mount Pleasant, Westchester county, SBL No. 116.16-1-1 14; 11 (b) a public maintenance facility known as the "Westchester County 12 Department of Public Works Maintenance Facility", located at Hammond 13 House Road behind 65 Hammond House Road in the hamlet of Valhalla in the 14 town of Mount Pleasant, Westchester county, SBL No. 116.12-1-14; 15 (c) a public building known as the "Westchester County Emergency 16 Services Building", located at 4 Dana Road in the hamlet of Valhalla in 17 the town of Mount Pleasant, Westchester county, SBL No. 116.16-1-1; 18 (d) a public building known as the "Westchester County Public Safety 19 Building", located at 1 Saw Mill River Road in the hamlet of Hawthorne 20 in the town of Mount Pleasant, Westchester county, SBL No. 106.18-1-2; 21 (e) the replacement of a bridge known as the "Anita Lane Utility 22 Bridge", crossing Mamaroneck River in the village of Mamaroneck, West- 23 chester county at coordinates 40°57'13.7"N 73°44'04.1"W; 24 (f) the replacement of a bridge known as the "Ward Avenue Bridge", 25 crossing Mamaroneck River in the village of Mamaroneck, Westchester 26 county at coordinates 40°57'08.3"N 73°44'03.2"W, BIN No. 2225110; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15975-01-6 S. 10558 2 1 (g) the replacement of a bridge known as the "Halstead Avenue Bridge", 2 crossing Mamaroneck River in the village of Mamaroneck, Westchester 3 county at coordinates 40°57'17.0"N 73°44'05.4"W, BIN No. 3348290; 4 (h) the replacement of a bridge known as the "Oakland Beach Avenue 5 Bridge", crossing Blind Brook in the city of Rye, Westchester county at 6 coordinates 40°57'44.7"N 73°41'21.1"W, BIN No. 2225300; 7 (i) the replacement of a bridge known as the "Playland Parkway 8 Bridge", crossing Blind Brook in the city of Rye, Westchester county at 9 coordinates 40°58'07.4"N 73°41'22.0"W, BIN No. 3349000; 10 (j) the replacement and daylighting of three culverts known as the 11 "East Blind Brook Culvert", located at: 12 (1) coordinates 41°01'03.1"N 73°40'47.2"W on Argyle Road in the 13 village of Rye Brook, Westchester county; 14 (2) coordinates 41°01'07.9"N 73°40'46.9"W on Betsy Brown Road in the 15 village of Rye Brook, Westchester county; and 16 (3) coordinates 41°01'15.7"N 73°40'42.8"W on Acker Drive in the 17 village of Rye Brook, Westchester county. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 19 the amendments to subdivision 2 of section 2 of chapter 573 of the laws 20 of 2025 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of 21 such chapter and shall be deemed repealed therewith.